Illinois, session 104th, HB4354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.214 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)7    Sec. 2-3.214. Pathway program for careers in priority 8sectors. 9    (a) The State Board of Education shall establish and 10administer a program to strengthen this State's workforce by 11creating structured pipelines from public high schools into 12in-demand careers through public-private partnerships with 13employers, public community colleges, and school districts. 14Under the program, the school board of each school district 15maintaining a high school shall allow the high school to 16partner with local employers and the community college 17district where the high school is located to establish a 18pathway program for careers in priority sectors. The State 19Board and the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 20shall jointly approve the pathway program prior to 21implementation of the pathway program and maintain a registry 22of participating high schools and employers.23    (b) A pathway program established under this Section must   HB4354- 2 -LRB104 16854 LNS 30264 b1include the following pathways:2        (1) a paid internship or apprenticeship in a priority 3    sector;4        (2) dual credit coursework aligned to an industry 5    certification in a priority sector; or6        (3) a job shadowing or mentorship opportunity in a 7    priority sector.8    (c) An employer participating in a pathway program 9established under this Section that provides a qualifying paid 10internship or apprenticeship under paragraph (1) of subsection 11(b) shall receive from the State Board a $1,000 grant per 12student holding the internship or apprenticeship; however, the 13grant may not exceed $50,000 per year.14    (d) At least 25% of any funds appropriated to implement 15this Section must be used to support pathway programs in high 16schools in high-poverty or rural school districts.